Maryland, session 2025, HB0164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0164*

HOUSE BILL 164
Article – Criminal Law
8–906.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER, POSSESS OR
CLAIM A RIGHT TO POSSESS RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THE PERSON DOES NOT
LAWFULLY POSSESS OR OWN.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90
DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER
THE FIRST VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH; AND
(3) FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN 2 YEARS
AFTER THE PRECEDING VIOLATION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR BOTH.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF:
(I) THE PERSON IN ACTUAL POSSESSION OF THE RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY HAS BEEN GRANTED POSSESSION UNDER A COURT ORDER; OR
(II) A REMEDY IS AVAILABLE UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(2) THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN THE
POSSESSION OF ANOTHER ALLEGEDLY IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION MAY SUBMIT A SWORN AFFIDAVIT TO THE SHERIFF FOR A COUNTY IN
WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED STATING THAT THE PERSON IS FRAUDULENTLY
IN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
SHERIFF SHALL REMOVE A PERSON IN POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY AFTER RECEIVING AN AFFIDAVIT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND RETURN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO THE OWNER.
(II) A DEPUTY SHERIFF MAY NOT REMOVE A PERSON IN
POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOLLOWING THE FILING OF AN

HOUSE BILL 164 3
AFFIDAVIT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE PERSON IN
POSSESSION PRODUCES EVIDENCE OF LAWFUL POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY FROM FILING A SUIT UNDER § 14–132 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
Article – Real Property
14–132.
(a) In this section, “wrongful detainer” means to hold possession of real property
without the right of possession.
(b) This section does not apply if:
(1) The person in actual possession of the property has been granted
possession under a court order;
(2) A remedy is available under Title 8 of this article; or
(3) Any other exclusive means to recover possession is provided by statute
or rule.
(c) A person may not hold possession of property unless the person is entitled to
possession of the property under the law.
(d) (1) If a person violates subsection (c) of this section, a person claiming
possession may make complaint in writing to the District Court of the county in which the
property is located.
(2) (I) On receipt of a complaint under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the court shall summons immediately the person in possession to appear before the court
on the day specified in the summons to show cause, if any, why restitution of the possession
of the property to the person filing the complaint should not be made.
(II) A HEARING SCHEDULED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE HELD NOT MORE THAN 14 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE
COMPLAINT IS FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) If, for any reason, the person in actual possession cannot be found
AFTER TWO GOOD FAITH EFFORTS ON DIFFERENT DAYS, the person authorized to serve
process by the Maryland Rules shall [affix]:
(I) FILE AN AFFIDAVIT WITH THE COURT DESCRIBING THE
GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO SERVE THE PERSON IN ACTUAL POSSESSION;

HOUSE BILL 164
(II) MAIL A COPY OF THE COMPLAINT BY CERTIFIED MAIL,
RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, AND FIRST–CLASS MAIL TO THE LAST KNOWN
ADDRESS OF THE PERSON IN ACTUAL POSSESSION AND, IF DIFFERENT, TO THE
ADDRESS OF THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY SUBJECT TO THE COMPLAINT; AND
(III) AFFIX an attested copy of the summons conspicuously on the
property.
(4) If notice of the summons is sent to the person in possession [by
first–class mail, the affixing of the summons] in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection, THE NOTICE shall constitute sufficient service to support restitution of
possession.
(5) SERVICE SHALL BE MADE UNDER PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF
THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 4 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE COMPLAINT IS FILED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(e) A counterclaim or cross–claim may not be filed in an action brought under this
section.
(f) (1) If the court determines that the complainant is legally entitled to
possession, the court shall:
(i) Give judgment for restitution of the possession of the property to
the complainant; and
(ii) Issue its warrant to the sheriff or constable commanding the
sheriff or constable to deliver possession to the complainant.
(2) The court may also give judgment in favor of the complainant for
damages due to the wrongful detainer and for court costs and attorney fees if:
(i) The complainant claimed damages in the complaint; and
(ii) The court finds that:
1. The person in actual possession was personally served
with the summons; or
2. There was service of process or submission to the
jurisdiction of the court as would support a judgment in contract or tort.
(3) A person in actual possession who is not personally served with a
summons is not subject to the personal jurisdiction of the District Court if the person

HOUSE BILL 164 5
appears in response to the summons and prior to the time that evidence is taken by the
court and asserts that the appearance is only for the purpose of defending an in rem action.
(g) Subject to § 8–118.1 of this article, a party to a wrongful detainer action
brought in the District Court under this section may demand a trial by jury in accordance
with Title 8, Subtitle 6 of this article.
(h) (1) Not later than 10 days from the entry of the judgment of the District
Court, either party may appeal to the circuit court for the county in which the property is
located.
(2) The person in actual possession of the property may retain possession
until the determination of the appeal if the person:
(i) Files with the court an affidavit that the appeal is not taken for
delay; and
(ii) 1. Files sufficient bond with one or more securities
conditioned on diligent prosecution of the appeal; or
2. Pays to the complainant or into the appellate court:
A. The fair rental value of the property for the entire period
of possession up to the date of judgment;
B. All court costs in the case;
C. All losses or damages other than the fair rental value of
the property up to the day of judgment that the court determined to be due because of the
detention of possession; and
D. The fair rental value of the property during the pendency
of the appeal.
(3) On application of either party, the court shall set a hearing date for the
appeal that is not less than 5 days or more than 15 days after the application for appeal.
(4) Notice of the order for a hearing shall be served on the parties or the
parties’ counsels not less than 5 days before the hearing.
(i) If the judgment of the circuit court shall be in favor of the person claiming
possession, a warrant shall be issued by the court to the sheriff, who shall proceed
immediately to execute the warrant.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 164
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.